North Dakota, session 69, SB2069.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 46-05-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
46-05-09. Publication of legal notices on website.
1. When a legal notice is required by law to be published in a newspaper, the newspaper also
shall publish the notice on a statewide legal notices website maintained by the North Dakota
newspaper association and on the newspaper's website in a location open and free to the
public, if the newspaper maintains a website, at no additional cost to the entity placing the
notice.
2. A state agency may request immediate publication of a notice on the North Dakota newspaper
association public notice website and the North Dakota newspaper association must provide
an affidavit of the posting. The posting is considered legal notification if a newspaper fails to
publish the legal notice in the newspaper.
3. If an insubstantial error in the notice occurs as a result of placement on the website and the
error is the fault of the newspaper, the error does not affect the validity and effectiveness of
the notice.
4. A notice required by law which is published on a statewide legal notices website maintained by
the North Dakota newspaper association or on a website maintained by the proper
governmental unit, fulfills the publication requirement if a newspaper fails to publish the notice
required by law in the newspaper.

S. B. NO. 2069 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2069.
Senate Vote: Yeas 32 Nays 15 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 72 Nays 17 Absent 5
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State